Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-4,149
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, prescribe forms, and perform all duties necessary to carry out its duties relating to the motor fuels tax.

Laws 1980, LB 722, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-481;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 61;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 32.